Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5620.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $100.00. State spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. TOTAL $ 100 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594.